Idaho, session 2025, H0445.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Water Resources the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
ManagementandSupportServices $432,400 $432,400
PlanningandTechnicalServices $30,058,700 30,058,700
Water Management $456,100 90,000 60,500 606,600
TOTAL $456,100 $30,148,700 $492,900 $31,097,700
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Water Resources is hereby increased by four (4.00) for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. CASH TRANSFER FOR AQUIFER MONITORING. There is hereby appro-
priated to the Department of Water Resources and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $716,000 from the Revolving Development Fund to the
Aquifer Planning and Management Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter
as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, to be used
for aquifer monitoring, measurement, and modeling.


SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER FOR WATER PROJECTS. There is hereby appropri-
ated to the Department of Water Resources and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $30,000,000 from the General Fund to the Water Man-
agement Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, to be used for water projects.
SECTION 5. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA STATE FISCAL RE-
COVERY FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Water
Resources any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappro-
priated to the Department of Water Resources in the Planning and Technical
Services Program from the ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund to be used for non-
recurring expenditures related to water infrastructure projects for fiscal
year 2025 for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund,
expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to
processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 6. FILING FEES FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 42-1414(1)(c), Idaho Code, it is the intent of the
Legislature that moneys appropriated to the Department of Water Resources
for Idaho's general stream adjudications from the General Fund count toward
the filing fees required under Section 42-1414(1)(a) and (b), Idaho Code,
for water right claims filed in Idaho's general stream adjudications by the
Idaho Water Resource Board and the Governor based on instream flow, public
lake level maintenance, or recreation. If the General Fund appropriation
exceeds the amount required for the Idaho Water Resource Board's and the Gov-
ernor's filing fees in the current fiscal year, the excess shall be counted
toward future filing fees required for those same purposes. If the General
Fund appropriation does not meet or exceed the fee required for claims of the
Idaho Water Resource Board or the Governor, the Director of the Department of
Water Resources shall grant an extension of time to the Idaho Water Resource
Board or the Governor to file the claim, and the General Fund appropriation
for the following fiscal year shall be counted toward the balance of the
filing fee.
SECTION 7. WATER MANAGEMENT FUND PROJECTS. Of the amount appropriated
in Section 1 of this act, $30,000,000 shall be used for water projects pur-
suant to the following criteria:
(1) The Water Resource Board shall use the funds for planning, con-
struction, rehabilitation, reconstruction, and improvement of water infra-
structure throughout the state. Projects shall prioritize:
(a) Aquifer recharge, ground water management, and other projects
aimed at sustaining aquifer health and long-term water availability;
(b) Development and rehabilitation of water storage and conveyance
systems, including reservoirs, diversion structures, pipelines, and
canals;
(c) Water supply and delivery improvements that enhance efficiency and
conservation; and
(d) Emergency water infrastructure repairs and upgrades to ensure the
resilience of vital water systems.


(2) Of the moneys appropriated in a single year, no more than fifty per-
cent (50%) of the funds appropriated in this section may be used within a sin-
gle board district, as defined in section 42-1732, Idaho Code, unless there
are no competing funding applications for water infrastructure projects in
other districts for the current fiscal year. For fiscal year 2026, fifty
percent (50%) of the appropriation for water projects shall be allocated for
use in board district 3 and fifty percent (50%) shall be allocated for use in
board district 4 for the purpose of supporting the 2024 Stipulated Mitiga-
tion Plan entered into by surface and ground water users on the Eastern Snake
Plain.
(3) The Department of Water Resources shall provide a report to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee, to the relevant germane legisla-
tive committees, and to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office no later than December 5, 2025. This report
shall include information required in Section 42-1760(3), Idaho Code, in a
format determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Divi-
sion of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 8. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.